Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4408
Self-binding arrangement for mental health care; advance consent to inpatient treatment or administration of psychotropic medication; requirements.

(1) A principal has a right to form a self-binding arrangement for mental health care in an advance mental health care directive. A self-binding arrangement allows the principal to obtain mental health treatment in the event that an acute mental health episode renders the principal incapacitated and induces the principal to refuse treatment.

(2) To provide advance consent to inpatient treatment despite the principal's illness-induced refusal, a principal shall, in such directive:

(a) Make the directive irrevocable pursuant to subsection (3) of section 30-4405; and

(b) Consent to admission to an inpatient treatment facility.

(3) To provide advance consent to administration of psychotropic medication despite the principal's illness-induced refusal of medication, a principal shall, in such directive:

(a) Make the directive irrevocable pursuant to subsection (3) of section 30-4405; and

(b) Consent to administration of psychotropic medication.

Laws 2020, LB247, § 8.